Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.09, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Permissions. (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 9 and sections 14.055 and 14.056, the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board may grant waivers to its rules upon application by a school district or a charter school for purposes of implementing experimental programs in learning or management. (b) To enable a school district or a charter school to meet the needs of students enrolled in an alternative education program and to enable licensed teachers instructing those students to satisfy content area licensure requirements, the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board may permit a licensed teacher teaching in an alternative education program to instruct students in a content area for which the teacher is not licensed, consistent with paragraph (a). (c) A special education license permission issued by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board for a primary employer's low-incidence region is valid in all low-incidence regions. (d) An applicant that has obtained career and technical education certification may apply for a Tier 1 license under section 122A.181. Consistent with section 136F.361, the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must strongly encourage approved teacher preparation programs throughout Minnesota to develop alternative pathways for certifying and licensing high school career and technical education instructors and teachers, allowing such applicants to meet certification and licensure standards that demonstrate their content knowledge, classroom experience, and pedagogical practices and their qualifications based on a combination of occupational testing, professional certification or licensure, and long-standing work experience. new text begin (e) An out-of-field permission that is valid between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2030, to teach in a special education assignment does not count toward any limit on the number of out-of-field permission renewals that may be granted to an applicant. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end